Maine, session 132, LD842.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2681, sub-§2, ¶F, as amended by PL 2003, c. 494, §4, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
F. "Qualified resident" means a resident of the State:
(1) Who has a family income equal to or less than 350% of the federal poverty
level and who is enrolled in the program;
(2) Whose family incurs unreimbursed expenses for prescription drugs that equal
5% or more of family income or whose total unreimbursed medical expenses equal
15% or more of family income. For purposes of this subparagraph, the cost of drugs
provided under this subchapter is considered an expense incurred by the family for
eligibility determination purposes; or
(3) Who would otherwise qualify for the federal Medicaid program under Title
XIX of the federal Social Security Act but for the person's immigration status and
who has a diagnosis of type 2 diabetes, hypertension or cardiovascular disease.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3174-FFF, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Eligibility. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective July 1,
2026, a person is eligible for the same scope of medical assistance provided under section
3174-G if the person would be eligible under the federal supplemental security income
program, 42 United States Code, Section 1381, et seq. but for the person's immigration
status. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective July 1, 2026, a
person 21 years of age or older with a diagnosis of cancer, organ failure or type 1 diabetes
is eligible for the same scope of medical assistance as provided under section 3174-G to a
person who would be eligible for assistance under the federal Medicaid program under
Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act but for the person's immigration status. In
accordance with 8 United States Code, Section 1621, the State shall appropriate funds in
the state budget to provide state-funded medical assistance through the MaineCare program
for noncitizen individuals who reside in the State and are ineligible for coverage due to
federal restrictions relating to immigration status in the federal Medicaid program.
Implementation of coverage required by this subsection is not contingent on federal
approval of any waivers or amendments to the state Medicaid plan for this purpose.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3174-FFF, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Maximization of federal matching funds. The department shall maximize the
receipt of available federal matching funds for coverage provided under subsection 3.
Sec. 4. Federal Medicaid waivers or state plan amendments; funding. The
Department of Health and Human Services shall establish coverage under the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3174-FFF, subsection 3 as of July 1, 2026, using state
funds. The department may seek to acquire federal matching funds when available under
the Medicaid program by submitting to the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services any waivers or state plan
amendments determined necessary. Implementation of coverage required by section
3174-FFF, subsection 3 is not contingent on federal approval of any waivers or
amendments to the state Medicaid plan or federal funding for this purpose.
Page 1 - 132LR0196(01)

Sec. 5. Stakeholder group. The Department of Health and Human Services is
directed to convene a stakeholder group pursuant to this section.
1. Emergency benefits. No later than October 1, 2025, the Office of MaineCare
Services within the department is directed to convene a stakeholder group to review
emergency Medicaid programs of other states and make recommendations for rulemaking
for the emergency MaineCare program, including, but not limited to, determining
additional conditions and services that can be covered by the emergency MaineCare
program. No later than July 1, 2026, the department shall adopt routine technical rules to
include additional conditions and services as allowable under the federal Medicaid program
under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, including, but not limited to, bone
fractures of the skull, arm, leg, neck, spine or pelvis; dialysis; hypertensive emergencies;
and diabetic emergencies.
2. Members. The stakeholder group consists of the Director of the Office of MaineCare
Services or the director's designee and at least 5 other members, including:
A. One member with policy and legal expertise or experience in promoting access to
health care for low-income individuals and individuals who are immigrants;
B. Three members representing community-based organizations with experience
providing outreach and education to residents of this State who are immigrants; and
C. One member representing the Medicaid ombudsman program.
Sec. 6. Rulemaking. The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt
rules to implement the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 2681, subsection 2,
paragraph F, subparagraph (3) and section 3174-FFF, subsection 3 no later than July 1,
2026. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title
5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.